Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2227.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; 2026 SPECIAL OLYMPICS USA GAMES.new text end new text begin (a) $1,500,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the director of Explore Minnesota for a grant to the 2026 Special Olympics USA Games. new text end new text begin (b) $500,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the workforce development fund to the commissioner of employment and economic development for a grant to the 2026 Special Olympics USA Games to support activities as part of the games aimed at increasing employment of individuals with intellectual and developmental disabilities. new text end new text begin (c) These appropriations are onetime. new text end